Utah statutes.
31A-11-108.   Denial of certificate of authority.
If the commissioner declines or fails to issue a certificate of authority
under Section 31A-11-107 within a reasonable time, he shall issue an order
giving a reasonably detailed explanation for the refusal or the delay.
